Yamls/Pron-nekoda_gt-norm.yaml
##Pronoun – кӧдакӧ: # Indefinite Pronoun 'Joku / Кто-то, который-нибудь'
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: кӧдакӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: [кӧдӧкӧ, кӧдӧскӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: кӧдалӧнкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl: кӧдаліськӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat: кӧдалӧкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins: [кӧдӧнкӧ, кӧдаӧнкӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: кӧдакӧткӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car: кӧдакӧтӧг
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns: [кӧдалакӧ, кӧдакӧла]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr: [кӧдасякӧ, кӧдакӧся]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine: кӧдаынкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela: кӧдаиськӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: кӧдаӧкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr: [кӧдаланькӧ, кӧдакӧлань]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr: [кӧдасянькӧ, кӧдакӧсянь]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl: кӧдаӧткӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI: кӧдаӧдзкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII: [кӧдавикӧ, кӧдакӧви]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne: [кӧдакӧланьын, кӧдаланьынкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla: [кӧдакӧланись, кӧдаланиськӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll: [кӧдакӧланьӧ, кӧдаланьӧкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr: [кӧдакӧланьсянь, кӧдаланьсянькӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl: [кӧдакӧланьӧт, кӧдаланьӧткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI: [кӧдакӧланьӧдз, кӧдаланьӧдзкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII: [кӧдакӧланьви, кӧдаланьвикӧ]


    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: кӧдаӧкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧскӧ, кӧдӧскӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: кӧдаӧлӧнкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: кӧдаӧліськӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: кӧдаӧлӧкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxSg1: кӧднамкӧ 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxSg1: кӧдаӧкӧткӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxSg1: кӧдаӧкӧтӧг
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxSg1: кӧдаӧкӧла
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧсякӧ, кӧдаӧкӧся]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxSg1: кӧдамкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxSg1: кӧдсимкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxSg1: кӧдамкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧкӧлань, кӧдаӧланькӧ, кӧдланямкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧкӧсянь, кӧдаӧсянькӧ, кӧдсянямкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxSg1: [кӧдӧттямкӧ, кӧдӧттимкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxSg1: [кӧдӧдззамкӧ, кӧдӧдззимкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧкӧви, кӧдаӧвикӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧкӧланьын, кӧдаӧланьынкӧ, кӧдланямкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧкӧланись, кӧдаӧланиськӧ, кӧдланьсимкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧкӧланьӧ, кӧдаӧланьӧкӧ, кӧдланямкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧкӧланьсянь, кӧдаӧланьсянькӧ, кӧдланьсянямкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧкӧланьӧт, кӧдаӧланьӧткӧ, кӧдланьӧттямкӧ, кӧдланьӧттимкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧкӧланьӧдз, кӧдаӧланьӧдзкӧ, кӧдланьӧдззамкӧ, кӧдланьӧдззимкӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg1: [кӧдаӧкӧланьви, кӧдаӧланьвикӧ]


    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: кӧдыткӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: кӧдтӧкӧ 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: кӧдытлӧнкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: кӧдытліськӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: кӧдытлӧкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxSg2: кӧднаткӧ 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxSg2: кӧдыткӧткӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxSg2: кӧдыткӧтӧг
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxSg2: кӧдытлакӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg2: [кӧдытсякӧ, кӧдыткӧся]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxSg2: кӧдаткӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxSg2: кӧдситкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxSg2: кӧдаткӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxSg2: [кӧдыткӧлань, кӧдытланькӧ, кӧдланяткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxSg2: [кӧдыткӧсянь, кӧдытсянькӧ, кӧдсяняткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxSg2: [кӧдӧттяткӧ, кӧдӧттиткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxSg2: [кӧдӧдззаткӧ, кӧдӧдззиткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxSg2: [кӧдыткӧви, кӧдытвикӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxSg2: [кӧдыткӧланьын, кӧдытланьынкӧ, кӧдланяткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxSg2: [кӧдыткӧланись, кӧдытланиськӧ, кӧдланьситкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxSg2: [кӧдыткӧланьӧ, кӧдытланьӧкӧ, кӧдланяткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg2: [кӧдыткӧланьсянь, кӧдытланьсянькӧ, кӧдланьсяняткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg2: [кӧдыткӧланьӧт, кӧдытланьӧткӧ, кӧдланьӧттяткӧ, кӧдланьӧттиткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg2: [кӧдыткӧланьӧдз, кӧдытланьӧдзкӧ, кӧдланьӧдззаткӧ, кӧдланьӧдззиткӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg2: [кӧдыткӧланьви, кӧдытланьвикӧ]


    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: кӧдыскӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: кӧдсӧкӧ 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: кӧдыслӧнкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: кӧдысліськӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: кӧдыслӧкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxSg3: кӧднаскӧ 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxSg3: кӧдыскӧткӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxSg3: кӧдыскӧтӧг
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxSg3: кӧдыслакӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxSg3: [кӧдыссякӧ, кӧдыскӧся]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxSg3: кӧдаскӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxSg3: кӧдсискӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxSg3: кӧдаскӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxSg3: [кӧдыскӧлань, кӧдысланькӧ, кӧдланяскӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxSg3: [кӧдыскӧсянь, кӧдыссянькӧ, кӧдсяняскӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxSg3: [кӧдӧттяскӧ, кӧдӧттискӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxSg3: [кӧдӧдззаскӧ, кӧдӧдззискӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxSg3: [кӧдыскӧви, кӧдысвикӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxSg3: [кӧдыскӧланьын, кӧдысланьынкӧ, кӧдланяскӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxSg3: [кӧдыскӧланись, кӧдысланиськӧ, кӧдланьсискӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxSg3: [кӧдыскӧланьӧ, кӧдысланьӧкӧ, кӧдланяскӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxSg3: [кӧдыскӧланьсянь, кӧдысланьсянькӧ, кӧдланьсяняскӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxSg3: [кӧдыскӧланьӧт, кӧдысланьӧткӧ, кӧдланьӧттяскӧ, кӧдланьӧттискӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxSg3: [кӧдыскӧланьӧдз, кӧдысланьӧдзкӧ, кӧдланьӧдззаскӧ, кӧдланьӧдззискӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxSg3: [кӧдыскӧланьви, кӧдысланьвикӧ]


    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: кӧднымкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: кӧднымӧскӧ 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: кӧднымлӧнкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: кӧднымліськӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: кӧднымлӧкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxPl1: [кӧднымӧнкӧ, кӧднанымкӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxPl1: кӧднымкӧткӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxPl1: кӧднымкӧтӧг
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxPl1: кӧднымлакӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl1: [кӧднымсякӧ, кӧднымкӧся]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxPl1: кӧднымынкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxPl1: [кӧднымиськӧ, кӧдсинымкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxPl1: кӧднымӧкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxPl1: [кӧднымкӧлань, кӧднымланькӧ, кӧдланянымкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxPl1: [кӧднымкӧсянь, кӧднымсянькӧ, кӧдсянянымкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxPl1: [кӧднымӧткӧ, кӧдӧттянымкӧ, кӧдӧттинымкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxPl1: [кӧднымӧдзкӧ, кӧдӧдззанымкӧ, кӧдӧдззинымкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxPl1: [кӧднымкӧви, кӧднымвикӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxPl1: [кӧднымкӧланьын, кӧднымланьынкӧ, кӧдланянымкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxPl1: [кӧднымкӧланись, кӧднымланиськӧ, кӧдланьсинымкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxPl1: [кӧднымкӧланьӧ, кӧднымланьӧкӧ, кӧдланянымкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl1: [кӧднымкӧланьсянь, кӧднымланьсянькӧ, кӧдланьсянянымкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl1: [кӧднымкӧланьӧт, кӧднымланьӧткӧ, кӧдланьӧттянымкӧ, кӧдланьӧттинымкӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl1: [кӧднымкӧланьӧдз, кӧднымланьӧдзкӧ, кӧдланьӧдззанымкӧ, кӧдланьӧдззинымкӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl1: [кӧднымкӧланьви, кӧднымланьвикӧ]


    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: кӧдныткӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: кӧднытӧкӧ 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: кӧднытлӧнкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: кӧднытліськӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: кӧднытлӧкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxPl2: [кӧднытӧнкӧ, кӧднаныткӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxPl2: кӧдныткӧткӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxPl2: кӧдныткӧтӧг
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxPl2: кӧднытлакӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl2: [кӧднытсякӧ, кӧдныткӧся]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxPl2: кӧднытынкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxPl2: [кӧднытіськӧ, кӧдсиныткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxPl2: кӧднытӧкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxPl2: [кӧдныткӧлань, кӧднытланькӧ, кӧдланяныткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxPl2: [кӧдныткӧсянь, кӧднытсянькӧ, кӧдсяняныткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxPl2: [кӧднытӧткӧ, кӧдӧттяныткӧ, кӧдӧттиныткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxPl2: [кӧднытӧдзкӧ, кӧдӧдззаныткӧ, кӧдӧдззиныткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxPl2: [кӧдныткӧви, кӧднытвикӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxPl2: [кӧдныткӧланьын, кӧднытланьынкӧ, кӧдланяныткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxPl2: [кӧдныткӧланись, кӧднытланиськӧ, кӧдланьсиныткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxPl2: [кӧдныткӧланьӧ, кӧднытланьӧкӧ, кӧдланяныткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl2: [кӧдныткӧланьсянь, кӧднытланьсянькӧ, кӧдланьсяняныткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl2: [кӧдныткӧланьӧт, кӧднытланьӧткӧ, кӧдланьӧттяныткӧ, кӧдланьӧттиныткӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl2: [кӧдныткӧланьӧдз, кӧднытланьӧдзкӧ, кӧдланьӧдззаныткӧ, кӧдланьӧдззиныткӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl2: [кӧдныткӧланьви, кӧднытланьвикӧ]


    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: кӧдныскӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: кӧднысӧкӧ 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: кӧдныслӧнкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: кӧднысліськӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: кӧдныслӧкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ins+PxPl3: [кӧднысӧнкӧ, кӧднаныскӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com+PxPl3: кӧдныскӧткӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Car+PxPl3: кӧдныскӧтӧг
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cns+PxPl3: кӧдныслакӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Cmpr+PxPl3: [кӧдныссякӧ, кӧдныскӧся]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ine+PxPl3: кӧднысынкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ela+PxPl3: [кӧднысіськӧ, кӧдсиныскӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill+PxPl3: кӧднысӧкӧ
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Apr+PxPl3: [кӧдныскӧлань, кӧднысланькӧ, кӧдланяныскӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Egr+PxPl3: [кӧдныскӧсянь, кӧдныссянькӧ, кӧдсяняныскӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+Prl+PxPl3: [кӧднысӧткӧ, кӧдӧттяныскӧ, кӧдӧттиныскӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerI+PxPl3: [кӧднысӧдзкӧ, кӧдӧдззаныскӧ, кӧдӧдззиныскӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+TerII+PxPl3: [кӧдныскӧви, кӧднысвикӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIne+PxPl3: [кӧдныскӧланьын, кӧднысланьынкӧ, кӧдланяныскӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEla+PxPl3: [кӧдныскӧланись, кӧднысланиськӧ, кӧдланьсиныскӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprIll+PxPl3: [кӧдныскӧланьӧ, кӧднысланьӧкӧ, кӧдланяныскӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprEgr+PxPl3: [кӧдныскӧланьсянь, кӧднысланьсянькӧ, кӧдланьсяняныскӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprPrl+PxPl3: [кӧдныскӧланьӧт, кӧднысланьӧткӧ, кӧдланьӧттяныскӧ, кӧдланьӧттиныскӧ]
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerI+PxPl3: [кӧдныскӧланьӧдз, кӧднысланьӧдзкӧ, кӧдланьӧдззаныскӧ, кӧдланьӧдззиныскӧ] 
    кӧдакӧ+Pron+Indef+Sg+AprTerII+PxPl3: [кӧдныскӧланьви кӧднысланьвикӧ]
